Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.684

[Art. 91] Insubordinate conduct toward warrant officer or noncommissioned officer.

Any warrant officer or enlisted member who:

(1) Strikes or assaults a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of the officer's office;

(2) Wilfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer; or

(3) Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of the officer's office;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 64; 1963 c 220 s 90.]